District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-2805

Establishment of licensing periods by Mayor; prorating for late application.

Repealed.

History

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 623, ch. 1352, § 7, par. 2
July 1, 1932, 47 Stat. 550, ch. 366
July 22, 1947, 61 Stat. 402, ch. 296, § 1
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 101(c), 45 DCR 1172

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2805.
1973 Ed., § 47-2305.

References in Text

“This act”, referred to in the first sentence of this section, is 32 Stat. 590, ch. 1352, approved July 1, 1902.

Editor's Notes

D.C. Law 12-261, title II, § 2003(pp)(6) ( 46 DCR 3142), eff. April 20, 1999, amends § 47-2805 without reference to its prior repeal by D.C. Law 12-86.